Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-184
Vehicle identification inspections;
application for training; contents.

The sheriff may designate
an employee of his or her office, any individual who is a peace officer as
defined in section 60-646, or, by agreement, a county treasurer to assist in accomplishing
inspections. Upon designation, the person shall request approval for training
from the superintendent. Any person requesting approval for training shall
submit a written application to the patrol. Such application shall include
the following information: (1) The name and address of the applicant; (2)
the name and address of the agency employing the applicant and the name of
the agency head; and (3) such biographical information as the superintendent
may require to facilitate the designation authorized by this section.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 84;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 51.